California statutes. Corporations Code
(b) A declaration in writing executed by them under penalty of perjury and stating the date and place (whether within or without this state) of execution.

Any affidavit sworn to without this state before a notary public or a judge or clerk of a court of record having an official seal need not be further authenticated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5077.

“Vote” includes, but is not limited to, authorization by written consent pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5211, subdivision (b) of Section 7211, or subdivision (b) of Section 9211 and authorization by written ballot pursuant to Section 5513, Section 7513, or Section 9413.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5078.

“Voting power” means the power to vote for the election of directors at the time any determination of voting power is made and does not include the right to vote upon the happening of some condition or event which has not yet occurred. In any case where different classes of memberships are entitled to vote as separate classes for different members of the board, the determination of percentage of voting power shall be made on the basis of the percentage of the total number of authorized directors which the memberships in question (whether of one or more classes) have the power to elect in an election at which all memberships then entitled to vote for the election of any directors are voted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.

“Written” or “in writing” includes facsimile, telegraphic, and other electronic communication as authorized by this code, including an electronic transmission by a corporation that satisfies the requirements of Section 20.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5080.

“Written ballot” does not include a ballot distributed at a special or regular meeting of members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 2. NONPROFIT PUBLIC BENEFIT CORPORATIONS [5110. - 6910.]



  CHAPTER 1. Organization and Bylaws [5110. - 5160.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title and Purposes [5110. - 5111.]

5110.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5111.

Subject to any other provisions of law of this state applying to the particular class of corporation or line of activity, a corporation may be formed under this part for any public or charitable purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation [5120. - 5122.5.]

5120.

(a) One or more persons may form a corporation under this part by executing and filing articles of incorporation.

(b) If initial directors are named in the articles, each director named in the articles shall sign and acknowledge the articles; if initial directors are not named in the articles, the articles shall be signed by one or more persons who thereupon are the incorporators of the corporation.

(c) The corporate existence begins upon the filing of the articles and continues perpetually, unless otherwise expressly provided by law or in the articles.

(d) At
 the time of filing pursuant to this section, the Secretary of State shall make available the filed articles of incorporation to the Attorney General.

(e) If the corporation was created by the elected legislative body in order to exercise authority that may lawfully be delegated by the elected governing body to a private corporation or other entity, the Secretary of State shall forward a copy of the filed articles of incorporation to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 45.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5121.

(a) In the case of an existing unincorporated association, the association may change its status to that of a corporation upon a proper authorization for such by the association in accordance with its rules and procedures.

(b) In addition to the matters required to be set forth in the articles pursuant to Section 5130, the articles in the case of an incorporation authorized by subdivision (a) shall set forth that an existing unincorporated association, stating its name, is being incorporated by the filing of the articles.

(c) The articles filed pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by a verified statement of any two officers or governing board members of the association stating that the incorporation of the association by means of the articles to which the verified statement is attached has been approved by the association in accordance with its rules and procedures.

(d) Upon the change of status of an unincorporated association to a corporation pursuant to subdivision (a), the property of the association becomes the property of the corporation and the members of the association who had any voting rights of the type referred to in Section 5056 become members of the corporation.

(e) The filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the association is located of a copy of the articles of incorporation filed pursuant to this section, certified by the Secretary of State shall evidence record ownership in the corporation of all interests of the association in and to the real property located in that county.

(f) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of the association shall be preserved unimpaired. Any action or proceeding pending by or against the unincorporated association may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the corporation, or the corporation may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(g) If a corporation is organized by a person who is or was an officer, director or member of an unincorporated association and such corporation is not organized pursuant to subdivision (a), the unincorporated association may continue to use its name and the corporation may not use a name which is the same as or similar to the name of the unincorporated association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5122.

(a) The Secretary of State shall not file articles setting forth a name in which “bank,” “trust,” “trustee,” or related words appear, unless the certificate of approval of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation is attached thereto.

(b) The name of a corporation shall not be a name that the Secretary of State determines is likely to mislead the public and shall be distinguishable in the records of the Secretary of State from all of the following:

(1) The name of any corporation.

(2) The name of any foreign corporation authorized to transact intrastate
 business in this state.

(3) Each name that is under reservation pursuant to this title.

(4) The name of a foreign corporation that has registered its name pursuant to Section 2101.

(5) An alternate name of a foreign corporation under subdivision (b) of Section 2106.

(6) A name that will become the record name of a domestic or foreign corporation upon a corporate instrument when there is a delayed effective or file date.

(c) The use by a corporation of a name in violation of this section may be enjoined notwithstanding the filing of its articles by the Secretary of State.

(d) Any applicant may, upon payment of the fee prescribed therefor in the Government Code, obtain from the Secretary of State a certificate of reservation of any name not prohibited by subdivision (b), and upon the issuance of the certificate the name stated therein shall be reserved for a period of 60 days. The Secretary of State shall not, however, issue certificates reserving the same name for two or more consecutive 60-day periods to the same applicant or for the use or benefit of the same person; nor shall consecutive reservations be made by or for the use or benefit of the same person of names so similar as to fall within the prohibitions of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 46.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5122.5.

The Secretary of State shall not reserve a corporate name or file articles using the name Golden State Energy unless those articles are for Golden State Energy, incorporated and operating pursuant to this part and Division 1.7 (commencing with Section 3400) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 2.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Articles of Incorporation [5130. - 5134.]

5130.

The articles of incorporation of a corporation formed under this part shall set forth:

(a) The name of the corporation.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the following statement:
“This corporation is a nonprofit public benefit corporation and is not organized for the private gain of any person. It is organized under the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law for (public or charitable [insert one or both]) purposes.”[If the purposes include “public” purposes, the articles shall, and
 in all other cases the articles may, include a further description of the corporation’s purposes.]
(2) If the corporation is a public bank, as defined in Section 57600 of the Government Code, the articles shall set forth a statement of purpose that is prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 57601 of the Government Code.

(c) The name and street address in this state of the corporation’s initial agent for service of process in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 6210.

(d) The initial street address of the corporation.

(e) The initial mailing address of the corporation, if different from the initial street address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 442, Sec. 2.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5131.

The articles of incorporation may set forth a further statement limiting the purposes or powers of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.

(a) The articles of incorporation may set forth any or all of the following provisions, which shall not be effective unless expressly provided in the articles:

(1) A provision limiting the duration of the corporation’s existence to a specified date.

(2) In the case of a subordinate corporation instituted or created under the authority of a head organization, a provision setting forth either or both of the following:

(A) That the subordinate corporation shall dissolve whenever its charter is surrendered to, taken away by, or revoked by the head organization granting it.

(B) That in the event of its dissolution pursuant to an article provision allowed by subparagraph (A) or in the event of its dissolution for any reason, any assets of the corporation after compliance with the applicable provisions
 of Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 6510), 16 (commencing with Section 6610) and 17 (commencing with Section 6710) shall be distributed to the head organization.

(b) Nothing contained in subdivision (a) shall affect the enforceability, as between the parties thereto, of any lawful agreement not otherwise contrary to public policy.

(c) The articles of incorporation may set forth any or all of the following provisions:

(1) The names and addresses of the persons appointed to act as initial directors.

(2) The classes of members, if any, and if there are two or more classes, the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions and conditions attaching to each class.

(3) A provision that would
 allow any member to have more or less than one vote in any election or other matter presented to the members for a vote.

(4) A provision that requires an amendment to the articles, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 5812, or to the bylaws, and any amendment or repeal of that amendment, to be approved in writing by a specified person or persons other than the board or the members. However, this approval requirement, unless the articles specify otherwise, shall not apply if any of the following circumstances exist:

(A) The specified person or persons have died or ceased to exist.

(B) If the right of the specified person or persons to approve is in the capacity of an officer, trustee, or other status and the office, trust, or status has ceased to exist.

(C) If the corporation has a specific proposal for amendment or repeal, and the corporation has provided written notice of that proposal, including a copy of the proposal, to the specified person or persons at the most recent address for each of them, based on the corporation’s records, and the corporation has not received written approval or nonapproval within the period specified in the notice, which shall not be less than 10 nor more than 30 days commencing at least 20 days after the notice has been provided.

(5) Any other provision, not in conflict with law, for the management of the activities and for the conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including any provision that is required or permitted by this part to be stated in the bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 6.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5133.

For all purposes other than an action in the nature of quo warranto, a copy of the articles of a corporation duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the formation of the corporation and prima facie evidence of its corporate existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5134.

If initial directors have not been named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators, until the directors are elected, may do whatever is necessary and proper to perfect the organization of the corporation, including the adoption and amendment of bylaws of the corporation and the election of directors and officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers [5140. - 5142.]

5140.

Subject to any limitations contained in the articles or bylaws and to compliance with other provisions of this division and any other applicable laws, a corporation, in carrying out its activities, shall have all of the powers of a natural person, including, without limitation, the power to:

(a) Adopt, use, and at will alter a corporate seal, but failure to affix a seal does not affect the validity of any instrument.

(b) Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws.

(c) Qualify to conduct its activities in any other state, territory, dependency, or foreign country.

(d) Issue, purchase, redeem, receive, take or
 otherwise acquire, own, sell, lend, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, pledge, use, and otherwise deal in and with its own bonds, debentures, notes, and debt securities.

(e) Issue memberships.

(f) Pay pensions, and establish and carry out pension, deferred compensation, saving, thrift, and other retirement, incentive, and benefit plans, trusts, and provisions for any or all of its directors, officers, employees, and persons providing services to it or any of its subsidiary or related or associated corporations, and to indemnify and purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any fiduciary of such plans, trusts, or provisions.

(g) Levy dues, assessments, and admission fees.

(h) Make donations for the public welfare or for community funds,
 hospital, charitable, educational, scientific, civic, religious, or similar purposes.

(i) Assume obligations, enter into contracts, including contracts of guaranty or suretyship, incur liabilities, borrow or lend money or otherwise use its credit, and secure any of its obligations, contracts, or liabilities by mortgage, pledge, or other encumbrance of all or any part of its property and income.

(j) Participate with others in any partnership, joint venture, or other association, transaction, or arrangement of any kind whether or not such participation involves sharing or delegation of control with or to others.

(k) Act as trustee under any trust incidental to the principal objects of the corporation, and receive, hold, administer, exchange, and expend funds and property subject to such trust.

(l) Carry on a business at a profit and apply any profit that results from the business activity to any activity in which it may lawfully engage.

(m) Pay the reasonable value of services rendered in this state to the corporation before January 1, 1975, and not previously paid, by any person who performed such services on a full-time basis under the direction of a religious organization in connection with the religious tenets of the organization. Such person shall have relied solely on the religious organization for their financial support for a minimum of five years. A payment shall not be made if such person or religious organization waives the payment or receipt of compensation for such services in writing. Payment may be made to such religious organization to reimburse it for maintenance of any person who rendered such services and to assist it in providing future support
 and maintenance; however, payment shall not be made from any funds or assets acquired with funds donated by or traceable to gifts made to the corporation by any person, organization, or governmental agency other than the members, immediate families of members, and affiliated religious organizations of the religious organization under whose direction the services were performed.

(n) (1) In anticipation of or during an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 5151:

(A) Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent resulting from the emergency.

(B) Relocate the principal office,
 designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

(2) During an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 5151:

(A) Give notice to a director or directors in any practicable manner under the circumstances, including, but not limited to, by publication and radio, when notice of a meeting of the board cannot be given to that director or directors in the manner prescribed by the bylaws or Section 5211.

(B) Deem that one or more officers of the corporation present at a board meeting is a director, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum for that
 meeting.

(3) In anticipation of or during an emergency, the board may take any action that it determines to be necessary or appropriate to respond to the emergency, mitigate the effects of the emergency, or comply with lawful federal and state government orders, but shall not take any action that requires the vote of the members, unless the required vote of the members was obtained prior to the emergency.

(4) Any actions taken in good faith in anticipation of or during an emergency under this subdivision bind the corporation and shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “emergency” means any of the following events or circumstances as a result of which, and only so long as, a quorum of the corporation’s board of directors cannot
 be readily convened for action:

(A) A natural catastrophe, including, but not limited to, a hurricane, tornado, storm, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, drought, epidemic, pandemic, or disease outbreak, or, regardless of cause, any fire, flood, or explosion.

(B) An attack on or within this state or on the public security of its residents by an enemy of this state or on the nation by an enemy of the United States of America, or upon receipt by this state of a warning from the federal government indicating that any such enemy attack is probable or imminent.

(C) An act of terrorism or other manmade disaster that results in extraordinary levels of casualties or damage or disruption severely affecting the infrastructure, environment, economy,
 government functions, or population, including, but not limited to, mass evacuations.

(D) A state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor of this state, including any person serving as Governor in accordance with Section 10 of Article V of the California Constitution and Section 12058 of the Government Code, or by the President of the United States of America.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 5.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5141.

Subject to Section 5142:

(a) No limitation upon the activities, purposes, or powers of the corporation or upon the powers of the members, officers, or directors, or the manner of exercise of such powers, contained in or implied by the articles or by Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 6510), 16 (commencing with Section 6610), and 17 (commencing with Section 6710) shall be asserted as between the corporation or member, officer or director and any third person, except in a proceeding: (1) by a member or the state to enjoin the doing or continuation of unauthorized activities by the corporation or its officers, or both, in cases where third parties have not acquired rights thereby, (2) to dissolve the corporation, or (3) by the corporation or by a member suing in a representative suit against the officers or directors of the corporation for violation of their authority.

(b) Any contract or conveyance made in the name of a corporation which is authorized or ratified by the board or is done within the scope of authority, actual or apparent, conferred by the board or within the agency power of the officer executing it, except as the board’s authority is limited by law other than this part, binds the corporation, and the corporation acquires rights thereunder whether the contract is executed or wholly or in part executory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5142.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5141, any of the following may bring an action to enjoin, correct, obtain damages for or to otherwise remedy a breach of a charitable trust:
 (1) The corporation, or a member in the name of the corporation pursuant to Section 5710.(2) An officer of the corporation.(3) A director of the corporation.(4) A person with a reversionary, contractual, or property interest in the assets subject to such charitable trust.(5) The Attorney General, or any person granted relator status by the Attorney General.The Attorney General shall be given notice of any action brought by the persons specified in paragraphs (1) through (4), and may intervene.

(b) In an action under this section, the court may not rescind or enjoin the performance of a contract unless:

(1) All of the parties to the contract are parties to the action;

(2) No party to the contract has, in good faith, and without actual notice of the trust restriction, parted with value under the contract or in reliance upon it; and

(3) It is equitable to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bylaws [5150. - 5153.]

5150.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), and Sections 5151, 5220, 5224, 5512, 5613, and 5616, bylaws may be adopted, amended or repealed by the board unless the action would materially and adversely affect the rights of members as to voting or transfer.

(b) Bylaws may be adopted, amended or repealed by approval of members (Section 5034); provided, however, that such adoption, amendment or repeal also requires approval by the members of a class if that action would materially and adversely affect the rights of that class as to voting or transfer in a manner different than that action affects another class.

(c) The articles or bylaws may restrict or eliminate the
 power of the board to adopt, amend or repeal any or all bylaws, subject to subdivision (e) of Section 5151.

(d) Bylaws may also provide that repeal or amendment of those bylaws, or the repeal or amendment of specified portions of those bylaws, may occur only with the approval in writing of a specified person or persons other than the board or members. However, this approval requirement, unless the bylaws specify otherwise, shall not apply if any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The specified person or persons have died or ceased to exist.

(2) If the right of the specified person or persons to approve is in the capacity of an officer, trustee, or other status and the office, trust, or status has ceased to exist.

(3) If the corporation has a
 specific proposal for amendment or repeal, and the corporation has provided written notice of that proposal, including a copy of the proposal, to the specified person or persons at the most recent address for each of them, based on the corporation’s records, and the corporation has not received written approval or nonapproval within the period specified in the notice, which shall not be less than 10 nor more than 30 days commencing at least 20 days after the notice has been provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 7.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5151.

(a) The bylaws shall set forth (unless that provision is contained in the articles, in which case it may only be changed by an amendment of the articles) the number of directors of the corporation, or the method of determining the number of directors of the corporation, or that the number of directors shall be not less than a stated minimum nor more than a stated maximum with the exact number of directors to be fixed, within the limits specified, by approval of the board or the members (Section 5034), in the manner provided in the bylaws, subject to subdivision (e). The number or minimum number of directors may be one or more.

(b) Once members have been admitted, a bylaw specifying or changing a fixed number of directors or the maximum or minimum number or changing
 from a fixed to a variable board or vice versa may only be adopted by approval of the members (Section 5034).

(c) The bylaws may contain any provision, not in conflict with law or the articles, for the management of the activities and for the conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including, but not limited to:

(1) Any provision referred to in subdivision (c) of Section 5132.

(2) The time, place, and manner of calling, conducting, and giving notice of members’, directors’, and committee meetings, or of conducting mail ballots.

(3) The qualifications, duties, and compensation of directors; the time of their election; and the requirements of a quorum for directors’ and committee meetings.

(4) The appointment and authority of committees.

(5) The appointment, duties, compensation, and tenure of officers.

(6) The mode of determination of members of record.

(7) The making of reports and financial statements to members.

(8) Setting, imposing, and collecting dues, assessments, and admission fees.

(d) The bylaws may provide for the manner of admission, withdrawal, suspension, and expulsion of members, consistent with the requirements of Section 5341.

(e) The bylaws may require, for any or all corporate actions (except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5222, subdivision
 (c) of Section 5616, and Section 6610), the vote of a larger proportion of, or all of, the members or the members of any class, unit, or grouping of members, or the vote of a larger proportion of, or all of, the directors, than is otherwise required by this part. Such a provision in the bylaws requiring such greater vote shall not be altered, amended, or repealed except by such greater vote, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws.

(f) The bylaws may contain a provision limiting the number of members, in total or of any class, which the corporation is authorized to admit.

(g) (1) The bylaws may contain any provision, not in conflict with the articles, to manage and conduct the business affairs of the corporation effective only in an emergency as defined in Section 5140, including, but not limited to, procedures for calling a board meeting, quorum requirements
 for a board meeting, and designation of additional or substitute directors.

(2) During an emergency, the board may take any action that it determines to be necessary or appropriate to respond to the emergency, mitigate the effects of the emergency, or comply with lawful federal and state government orders, but shall not take any action that requires the vote of the members, unless the required vote of the members was obtained prior to the emergency.

(3) All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws shall remain effective during the emergency, and the emergency bylaws shall not be effective after the emergency ends.

(4) Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws binds the corporation, and shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director,
 officer, employee, or agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 6.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.

A corporation may provide in its bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members. Where delegates are provided for, the bylaws shall set forth delegates’ terms of office, any reasonable method for delegates’ selection and removal, and any reasonable method for calling, noticing, and holding meetings of delegates, may set forth the manner in which delegates may act by written ballot similar to Section 5513 for written ballot of members, and may set forth the manner in which delegates may participate in meetings of delegates similar to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 5211 for meetings of directors. Each delegate shall have one vote on each matter presented for action. A delegate shall not vote by proxy. Delegates may be given a name other than
 “delegates.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 7.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5153.

A corporation may provide in its bylaws for voting by its members or delegates on the basis of chapter or other organizational unit, or by region or other geographic grouping.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Location and Inspection of Articles and Bylaws [5160. - 5160.]

5160.

Every corporation shall keep at its principal office in this state the original or a copy of its articles and bylaws as amended to date, which shall be open to inspection by the members at all reasonable times during office hours. If the corporation has no office in this state, it shall upon the written request of any member furnish to such member a copy of the articles or bylaws as amended to date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Directors and Management [5210. - 5260.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5210. - 5215.]

5210.

Each corporation shall have a board of directors. Subject to the provisions of this part and any limitations in the articles or bylaws relating to action required to be approved by the members (Section 5034), or by a majority of all members (Section 5033), the activities and affairs of a corporation shall be conducted and all corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the direction of the board. The board may delegate the management of the activities of the corporation to any person or persons, management company, or committee however composed, provided that the activities and affairs of the corporation shall be managed and all corporate powers shall be exercised under the ultimate direction of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5211.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in the articles or in the bylaws, all of the following apply:

(1) Meetings of the board may be called by the chair of the board or the president or any vice president or the secretary or any two directors.

(2) Regular meetings of the board may be held without notice if the time and place of the meetings are fixed by the bylaws or the board. Special meetings of the board shall be held upon four days’ notice by first-class mail or 48 hours’ notice delivered personally or by telephone, including a voice messaging system or by electronic transmission by the corporation (Section 20). The articles or bylaws may not dispense with notice of a special meeting. A notice, or waiver of
 notice, need not specify the purpose of any regular or special meeting of the board.

(3) Notice of a meeting need not be given to a director who provides a waiver of notice or consent to holding the meeting or an approval of the minutes thereof in writing, whether before or after the meeting, or who attends the meeting without protesting, prior thereto or at its commencement, the lack of notice to that director. These waivers, consents, and approvals shall be filed with the corporate records or made a part of the minutes of the meetings.

(4) A majority of the directors present, whether or not a quorum is present, may adjourn any meeting to another time and place. If the meeting is adjourned for more than 24 hours, notice of an adjournment to another time or place shall be given prior to the time of the adjourned meeting to the directors who were not present at the time of the
 adjournment.

(5) Meetings of the board may be held at a place within or without the state that has been designated in the notice of the meeting or, if not stated in the notice or there is no notice, designated in the bylaws or by resolution of the board.

(6) Directors may participate in a meeting through use of conference telephone, electronic video screen communication, or electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21). Participation in a meeting through use of conference telephone or electronic video screen communication pursuant to this subdivision constitutes presence in person at that meeting as long as all directors participating in the meeting are able to hear one another. Participation in a meeting through use of electronic transmission by and to the corporation, other than conference telephone and electronic video screen communication, pursuant to
 this subdivision constitutes presence in person at that meeting if both of the following apply:

(A) Each director participating in the meeting can communicate with all of the other directors concurrently.

(B) Each director is provided the means of participating in all matters before the board, including, without limitation, the capacity to propose, or to interpose an objection to, a specific action to be taken by the corporation.

(7) A majority of the number of directors authorized in or pursuant to the articles or bylaws constitutes a quorum of the board for the transaction of business. The articles or bylaws may require the presence of one or more specified directors in order to constitute a quorum of the board to transact business, as long as the death or nonexistence of a specified director or the death or
 nonexistence of the person or persons otherwise authorized to appoint or designate that director does not prevent the corporation from transacting business in the normal course of events. The articles or bylaws may not provide that a quorum shall be less than one-fifth the number of directors authorized in or pursuant to the articles or bylaws, or less than two, whichever is larger, unless the number of directors authorized in or pursuant to the articles or bylaws is one, in which case one director constitutes a quorum.

(8) Subject to the provisions of Sections 5212, 5233, 5234, 5235, and subdivision (e) of Section 5238, an act or decision done or made by a majority of the directors present at a meeting duly held at which a quorum is present is the act of the board. The articles or bylaws may not provide that a lesser vote than a majority of the directors present at a meeting is the act of the board. A meeting at which a quorum is initially
 present may continue to transact business notwithstanding the withdrawal of directors, if any action taken is approved by at least a majority of the required quorum for that meeting, or a greater number required by this division, the articles, or the bylaws.

(b) An action required or permitted to be taken by the board may be taken without a meeting if all directors individually or collectively consent in writing to that action and if, subject to subdivision (a) of Section 5224, the number of directors then in office constitutes a quorum. The written consent or consents shall be filed with the minutes of the proceedings of the board. The action by written consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote of the directors. For purposes of this subdivision only, “all directors” does not include an “interested director” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5233 or a “common director” as described in Section 5234 who abstains in
 writing from providing consent, if (1) the facts described in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 5233 are established or the provisions of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5234 are satisfied, as appropriate, at or prior to execution of the written consent or consents; (2) the establishment of those facts or satisfaction of those provisions, as applicable, is included in the written consent or consents executed by the noninterested or noncommon directors or in other records of the corporation; and (3) the noninterested or noncommon directors, as applicable, approve the action by a vote that is sufficient without counting the votes of the interested directors or common directors.

(c) Each director shall have one vote on each matter presented to the board of directors for action. A director shall not vote by proxy.

(d) The provisions of this section
 apply also to incorporators, to committees of the board, and to action by those incorporators or committees mutatis mutandis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 32.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5212.

(a) The board may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the number of directors then in office, provided that a quorum is present, create one or more committees, each consisting of two or more directors, to serve at the pleasure of the board. Appointments to such committees shall be by a majority vote of the directors then in office, unless the articles or bylaws require a majority vote of the number of directors authorized in or pursuant to the articles or bylaws. The bylaws may authorize one or more such committees, each consisting of two or more directors, and may provide that a specified officer or officers who are also directors of the corporation shall be a member or members of such committee or committees. The board may appoint one or more directors as alternate members of such